test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hatta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - hattâ: # â-stems hattu
    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: hattâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Acc: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: haatân
    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: haatâst
    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: hattáin
    hattâ+N+Ess: hattân
    hattâ+N+Par: hattâd
    hattâ+N+Pl+Nom: haatah
    hattâ+N+Pl+Gen: haatâi
    hattâ+N+Pl+Acc: haatâid
    hattâ+N+Pl+Ill: hattáid
    hattâ+N+Pl+Loc: haatâin
    hattâ+N+Pl+Com: hatâiguin
    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: hatâittáá
